Connecticut, session 2026, SB00227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Dietary supplement for weight loss or muscle building" means a
class of dietary supplement that is labeled, marketed or otherwise
represented for the purpose of achieving weight loss or muscle building,
but shall not include (A) protein powders, (B) protein drinks, and (C)
foods marketed as containing protein unless the protein powder,
protein drink or food marketed as containing protein contains an
ingredient other than protein which would, considered alone, constitute
a dietary supplement for weight loss or muscle building; and
(2) "Over-the-counter diet pill" means a class of drugs labeled,
marketed or otherwise represented for the purpose of achieving weight
loss that are lawfully sold, transferred or furnished over the counter
with or without a prescription pursuant to the federal Food, Drug and
Cosmetic Act, 21 USC 301 et seq., as amended from time to time, or
regulations adopted thereunder.
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 227
(b) There is established a task force to study the sale in the state of
dietary supplements for weight loss or muscle building and over-the-
counter diet pills. The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom has expertise in the safety of dietary supplements for
weight loss or muscle building and one of whom has expertise in the
safety of over-the-counter diet pills;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate;
(7) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the commissioner's
designee;
(8) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee; and
(9) The executive director of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity, who shall serve as chairperson of the
task force.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 227
(e) The chairperson of the task force shall schedule the first meeting
of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty days after the
effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to general law
shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to general
law, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, research
related to the safety of dietary supplements for weight loss or muscle
building and over-the-counter diet pills by age of users, whether the sale
to minors of such supplements or pills should be restricted and best
practices in other states for regulation of such supplements or pills.
Sec. 2. Section 20-579a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, "reproductive health care services" and
"gender-affirming health care services" have the same meanings as
provided in section 52-571m.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the Commissioner
of Consumer Protection and the Commission of Pharmacy shall not
deny the eligibility of an applicant for a license, permit or registration
under this chapter based on pending disciplinary action, an unresolved
complaint, [or] the imposition of disciplinary action or other adverse
action against the applicant by a duly authorized professional
disciplinary agency of another state, the District of Columbia, [or] a
commonwealth, territory or possession of the United States or any
federal entity that is based solely on the alleged provision of, receipt of,
assistance in provision or receipt of, material support for, or any theory
of vicarious, joint, several or conspiracy liability derived therefrom,
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 227
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health care
services that are permitted under the laws of this state and were
provided in accordance with the standard of care applicable to such
services. [, regardless of whether the patient receiving such services was
a resident of this state.] The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
where the underlying conduct of the applicant would constitute the
basis of disciplinary action against the applicant under the laws of this
state if the applicant had been licensed, permitted or registered in this
state and the conduct had occurred in this state.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the Commissioner
of Consumer Protection and the Commission of Pharmacy shall not
impose disciplinary action against any person licensed, permitted or
registered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter based on pending
disciplinary action, an unresolved complaint, [or] the imposition of
disciplinary action or other adverse action against the applicant by a
duly authorized professional disciplinary agency of another state, the
District of Columbia, [or] a commonwealth, territory or possession of
the United States or any federal entity that is based solely on the alleged
provision of, receipt of, assistance in provision or receipt of, material
support for, or any theory of vicarious, joint, several or conspiracy
liability derived therefrom, reproductive health care services or gender-
affirming health care services that are permitted under the laws of this
state and were provided in accordance with the standard of care
applicable to such services. [, regardless of whether the patient receiving
such services was a resident of this state.] The provisions of this
100 subsection shall not apply where the underlying conduct of the person
101 licensed, permitted or registered would constitute the basis of
102 disciplinary action against such person under the laws of this state if
103 such person had been licensed, permitted or registered in this state and
104 the conduct had occurred in this state.
105 Sec. 3. Section 19a-509c of the general statutes is repealed and the
106 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
107 In a facility licensed pursuant to this chapter, a physician assistant,
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 227
108 advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse or licensed
109 practical nurse may, except with respect to an order for schedule II
110 controlled substances, reduce to writing the oral or written order of a
111 prescribing practitioner, as defined in section 20-571, and transmit the
112 order to a pharmacy licensed under sections 20-570 to 20-625, inclusive.
113 Such transmitted order shall contain the name of the prescribing
114 practitioner and shall be treated as a written prescription for purposes
115 of sections 20-570 to 20-625, inclusive, except that, to the extent
116 allowable under federal law, at the prescribing practitioner's request,
117 the written or electronic prescription for drugs related to reproductive
118 health care services or gender-affirming health care services, as defined
119 in section 52-571m, shall include the name and address of the
120 prescribing and dispensing health care practice or facility instead of the
121 name and signature of the prescribing practitioner.
122 Sec. 4. Section 20-614 of the general statutes is amended by adding
123 subsection (g) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
124 (NEW) (g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) to (c),
125 inclusive, of this section, to the extent allowable under federal law, at
126 the prescribing practitioner's request, the written or electronic
127 prescription for drugs related to reproductive health care services or
128 gender-affirming health care services, as defined in section 52-571m,
129 shall include the name and address of the prescribing and dispensing
130 health care practice or facility instead of the name and signature of the
131 prescribing practitioner.
132 Sec. 5. Section 20-617 of the general statutes is amended by adding
133 subsection (d) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
134 (NEW) (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) to (c),
135 inclusive, of this section, to the extent allowable under federal law, at
136 the prescribing practitioner's written, electronic or verbal request to the
137 dispensing pharmacy, the dispensed label of each prescription drug that
138 is not a controlled substance and relates to reproductive health care
139 services or gender-affirming health care services, as defined in section
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 227
140 52-571m, shall include the name and address of the prescribing and
141 dispensing health care practice or facility instead of the name of the
142 prescribing practitioner.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 20-579a
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 19a-509c
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 20-614(g)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 20-617(d)
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6